Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-530
Wildlife species accidentally killed; disposal authorized.

Any wildlife species as designated by the commission accidentally killed by a motor vehicle on a public highway in this state, unless seized and confiscated pursuant to sections 37-619 to 37-621, shall, when salvageable, be disposed of as determined by the commission or its designee.

Laws 1983, LB 34, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-310;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 250;

Laws 2004, LB 1149, § 2.